Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-110
Documents relating to General Land Office; preservation and maintenance; federal authorities; free access.

All documents obtained from the General Land Office at Washington, D.C., shall be preserved and maintained as a part of the public records of Nebraska by the Nebraska State Historical Society, and by all other persons in such manner as shall secure the chief objects of their use and preservation, their care, custody and service, under proper library regulations. The authorities of the United States shall have free access to such documents.

Laws 1937, c. 196, § 2, p. 819;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 82-115;

R.S.1943, § 82-110.